Texas statutes.
CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

TITLE 1. CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

CHAPTER 2. GENERAL DUTIES OF OFFICERS

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.01. DUTIES OF DISTRICT ATTORNEYS. Each district attorney shall represent the State in all criminal cases in the district courts of his district and in appeals therefrom, except in cases where he has been, before his election, employed adversely. When any criminal proceeding is had before an examining court in his district or before a judge upon habeas corpus, and he is notified of the same, and is at the time within his district, he shall represent the State therein, unless prevented by other official duties. It shall be the primary duty of all prosecuting attorneys, including any special prosecutors, not to convict, but to see that justice is done. They shall not suppress facts or secrete witnesses capable of establishing the innocence of the accused.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 801, ch. 291, Sec. 98, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.02. DUTIES OF COUNTY ATTORNEYS. The county attorney shall attend the terms of court in his county below the grade of district court, and shall represent the State in all criminal cases under examination or prosecution in said county; and in the absence of the district attorney he shall represent the State alone and, when requested, shall aid the district attorney in the prosecution of any case in behalf of the State in the district court. He shall represent the State in cases he has prosecuted which are appealed.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 801, ch. 291, Sec. 99, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.021. DUTIES OF ATTORNEY GENERAL. The attorney general may offer to a county or district attorney the assistance of the attorney general's office in the prosecution of an offense described by Article 66.102(h) the victim of which is younger than 17 years of age at the time the offense is committed. On request of a county or district attorney, the attorney general shall assist in the prosecution of an offense described by Article 66.102(h) the victim of which is younger than 17 years of age at the time the offense is committed. For purposes of this article, assistance includes investigative, technical, and litigation assistance of the attorney general's office.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 593 (H.B. 8), Sec. 1.02, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1058 (H.B. 2931), Sec. 4.01, eff. January 1, 2019.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.022. ASSISTANCE OF TEXAS RANGERS. (a) The attorney representing the state may request the Texas Rangers division of the Department of Public Safety to provide assistance to a local law enforcement agency investigating an offense that:

(1) is alleged to have been committed by an elected officer of the political subdivision served by the local law enforcement agency; and

(2) on conviction or adjudication, would subject the elected officer to registration as a sex offender under Chapter 62.

(b) For purposes of this article, "assistance" includes investigative, technical, and administrative assistance.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 431 (H.B. 2130), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.023. NOTIFICATION TO TEXAS DEPARTMENT OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE. (a) This article applies only to a defendant who, in connection with a previous conviction for an offense listed in Article 42A.054(a) or for which the judgment contains an affirmative finding under Article 42A.054(c) or (d):

(1) received a sentence that included imprisonment at a facility operated by or under contract with the Texas Department of Criminal Justice; and

(2) was subsequently released from the imprisonment, including a release on parole, to mandatory supervision, or following discharge of the defendant's sentence.

(b) Not later than the 10th day after the date that a defendant described by Subsection (a) is indicted for an offense listed in Article 42A.054(a) or for which the judgment contains an affirmative finding under Article 42A.054(c) or (d), the attorney representing the state shall notify an officer designated by the Texas Department of Criminal Justice of the offense charged in the indictment.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 772 (H.B. 104), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.024. TRACKING USE OF CERTAIN TESTIMONY. (a) In this article:

(1) "Attorney representing the state" means a district attorney, a criminal district attorney, or a county attorney with criminal jurisdiction.

(2) "Correctional facility" has the meaning assigned by Section 1.07, Penal Code.

(b) An attorney representing the state shall track:

(1) the use of testimony of a person to whom a defendant made a statement against the defendant's interest while the person was imprisoned or confined in the same correctional facility as the defendant, if known by the attorney representing the state, regardless of whether the testimony is presented at trial; and

(2) any benefits offered or provided to a person in exchange for testimony described by Subdivision (1).

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 686 (H.B. 34), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(1), eff. September 1, 2019.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Art. 2.025. SPECIAL DUTY OF DISTRICT OR COUNTY ATTORNEY RELATING TO CHILD SUPPORT. If a district or county attorney receives money from a person who is required by a court order to pay child support through a local registry or the Title IV-D agency and the money is presented to the attorney as payment for the court-ordered child support, the attorney shall transfer the money to the local registry or Title IV-D agency designated as the place of payment in the child support order.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 40, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Art. 2.03. NEGLECT OF DUTY.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(a) It shall be the duty of the attorney representing the State to present by information to the court having jurisdiction, any officer for neglect or failure of any duty enjoined upon such officer, when such neglect or failure can be presented by information, whenever it shall come to the knowledge of said attorney that there has been a neglect or failure of duty upon the part of said officer; and he shall bring to the notice of the grand jury any act of violation of law or neglect or failure of duty upon the part of any officer, when such violation, neglect or failure is not presented by information, and whenever the same may come to his knowledge.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(a) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(2), eff. January 1, 2025.

(b) It is the duty of the trial court, the attorney representing the accused, the attorney representing the state and all peace officers to so conduct themselves as to insure a fair trial for both the state and the defendant, not impair the presumption of innocence, and at the same time afford the public the benefits of a free press.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1967, 60th Leg., p. 1733, ch. 659, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 28, 1967.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(2), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.04. SHALL DRAW COMPLAINTS. Upon complaint being made before a district or county attorney that an offense has been committed in his district or county, he shall reduce the complaint to writing and cause the same to be signed and sworn to by the complainant, and it shall be duly attested by said attorney.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.05. WHEN COMPLAINT IS MADE. If the offense be a misdemeanor, the attorney shall forthwith prepare an information based upon such complaint and file the same in the court having jurisdiction; provided, that in counties having no county attorney, misdemeanor cases may be tried upon complaint alone, without an information, provided, however, in counties having one or more criminal district courts an information must be filed in each misdemeanor case. If the offense be a felony, he shall forthwith file the complaint with a magistrate of the county.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.06. MAY ADMINISTER OATHS. For the purpose mentioned in the two preceding Articles, district and county attorneys are authorized to administer oaths.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.07. ATTORNEY PRO TEM. (a) Whenever an attorney for the state is disqualified to act in any case or proceeding, is absent from the county or district, or is otherwise unable to perform the duties of the attorney's office, or in any instance where there is no attorney for the state, the judge of the court in which the attorney represents the state may appoint, from any county or district, an attorney for the state or may appoint an assistant attorney general to perform the duties of the office during the absence or disqualification of the attorney for the state.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, the duties of the appointed office are additional duties of the appointed attorney's present office, and the attorney is not entitled to additional compensation. This subsection does not prevent a commissioners court of a county from contracting with another commissioners court to pay expenses and reimburse compensation paid by a county to an attorney who is appointed to perform additional duties.

(b-1) An attorney for the state who is not disqualified to act may request the court to permit the attorney's recusal in a case for good cause, and on approval by the court, the attorney is disqualified.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 580 (S.B. 341), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

(d) In this article, "attorney for the state" means a county attorney with criminal jurisdiction, a district attorney, or a criminal district attorney.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 580 (S.B. 341), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 580 (S.B. 341), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 580 (S.B. 341), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1967, 60th Leg., p. 1733, ch. 659, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 28, 1967; Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 356, ch. 154, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 1973.

Subsec. (b) amended by and subsec. (b-1) added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 918, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987; Subsecs. (e), (f) added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Subsec. (g) added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 580 (S.B. 341), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 580 (S.B. 341), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.08. DISQUALIFIED. (a) District and county attorneys shall not be of counsel adversely to the State in any case, in any court, nor shall they, after they cease to be such officers, be of counsel adversely to the State in any case in which they have been of counsel for the State.

(b) A judge of a court in which a district or county attorney represents the State shall declare the district or county attorney disqualified for purposes of Article 2.07 on a showing that the attorney is the subject of a criminal investigation by a law enforcement agency if that investigation is based on credible evidence of criminal misconduct for an offense that is within the attorney's authority to prosecute. A disqualification under this subsection applies only to the attorney's access to the criminal investigation pending against the attorney and to any prosecution of a criminal charge resulting from that investigation.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 977 (H.B. 1638), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Without reference to the amendment of this article, this article was repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Art. 2.09. WHO ARE MAGISTRATES. Each of the following officers is a magistrate within the meaning of this Code: The justices of the Supreme Court, the judges of the Court of Criminal Appeals, the justices of the Courts of Appeals, the judges of the District Court, the magistrates appointed by the judges of the district courts of Bexar County, Dallas County, or Tarrant County that give preference to criminal cases, the criminal law hearing officers for Harris County appointed under Subchapter L, Chapter 54, Government Code, the criminal law hearing officers for Cameron County appointed under Subchapter BB, Chapter 54, Government Code, the magistrates or associate judges appointed by the judges of the district courts of Lubbock County, Nolan County, or Webb County, the magistrates appointed by the judges of the criminal district courts of Dallas County or Tarrant County, the associate judges appointed by the judges of the district courts and the county courts at law that give preference to criminal cases in Jefferson County, the magistrates appointed by the judges of the district courts and statutory county courts in Denton County, the magistrates appointed by the judges of the district courts and statutory county courts in Grayson County, the associate judges appointed by the judges of the district courts and the statutory county courts of Brazos County, Nueces County, or Williamson County, the magistrates appointed by the judges of the district courts and statutory county courts that give preference to criminal cases in Travis County, the criminal magistrates appointed by the Brazoria County Commissioners Court, the criminal magistrates appointed by the Burnet County Commissioners Court, the magistrates appointed by the El Paso Council of Judges, the county judges, the judges of the county courts at law, judges of the county criminal courts, the judges of statutory probate courts, the associate judges appointed by the judges of the statutory probate courts under Chapter 54A, Government Code, the associate judges appointed by the judge of a district court under Chapter 54A, Government Code, the magistrates appointed under Subchapter JJ, Chapter 54, Government Code, the magistrates appointed by the Collin County Commissioners Court, the magistrates appointed by the Fort Bend County Commissioners Court, the justices of the peace, and the mayors and recorders and the judges of the municipal courts of incorporated cities or towns.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 5.01, eff. September 1, 2019.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 4.001, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.10. DUTY OF MAGISTRATES. It is the duty of every magistrate to preserve the peace within his jurisdiction by the use of all lawful means; to issue all process intended to aid in preventing and suppressing crime; to cause the arrest of offenders by the use of lawful means in order that they may be brought to punishment.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Art. 2.101. MAGISTRATE'S NAME ON SIGNED ORDER. (a) Any signed order that is issued by a magistrate under this code or any signed order pertaining to a criminal matter that is issued by a magistrate under the Family Code, the Government Code, or other law of this state must include, with the magistrate's signature, the magistrate's name in legible handwriting, legible typewritten form, or legible stamp print.

(b) The failure of a magistrate to include the magistrate's name on an order as provided by Subsection (a) does not affect the validity of the order.

(c) A defendant in a criminal action may make a motion to add to an order that does not comply with Subsection (a) the name of the magistrate who signed the order if:

(1) the order is relevant to the action; and

(2) the defendant is unable to identify the magistrate who signed the order.

(d) The supreme court may adopt rules to implement this article.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 421 (H.B. 1712), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Art. 2.11. EXAMINING COURT. When the magistrate sits for the purpose of inquiring into a criminal accusation against any person, this is called an examining court.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Without reference to the amendment of this article, this article was repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Art. 2.12. WHO ARE PEACE OFFICERS. The following are peace officers:

(1) sheriffs, their deputies, and those reserve deputies who hold a permanent peace officer license issued under Chapter 1701, Occupations Code;

(2) constables, deputy constables, and those reserve deputy constables who hold a permanent peace officer license issued under Chapter 1701, Occupations Code;

(3) marshals or police officers of an incorporated city, town, or village, and those reserve municipal police officers who hold a permanent peace officer license issued under Chapter 1701, Occupations Code;

(4) rangers, officers, and members of the reserve officer corps commissioned by the Public Safety Commission and the Director of the Department of Public Safety;

(5) investigators of the district attorneys', criminal district attorneys', and county attorneys' offices;

(6) law enforcement agents of the Texas Alcoholic Beverage Commission;

(7) each member of an arson investigating unit commissioned by a city, a county, or the state;

(8) officers commissioned under Section 37.081 or 37.0818, Education Code, or Subchapter E, Chapter 51, Education Code;

(9) officers commissioned by the General Services Commission;

(10) law enforcement officers commissioned by the Parks and Wildlife Commission;

(11) officers commissioned under Chapter 23, Transportation Code;

(12) municipal park and recreational patrolmen and security officers;

(13) security officers and investigators commissioned as peace officers by the comptroller;

(14) officers commissioned by a water control and improvement district under Section 49.216, Water Code;

(15) officers commissioned by a board of trustees under Chapter 54, Transportation Code;

(16) investigators commissioned by the Texas Medical Board;

(17) officers commissioned by:

(A) the board of managers of the Dallas County Hospital District, the Tarrant County Hospital District, the Bexar County Hospital District, or the El Paso County Hospital District under Section 281.057, Health and Safety Code;

(B) the board of directors of the Ector County Hospital District under Section 1024.117, Special District Local Laws Code;

(C) the board of directors of the Midland County Hospital District of Midland County, Texas, under Section 1061.121, Special District Local Laws Code; and

(D) the board of hospital managers of the Lubbock County Hospital District of Lubbock County, Texas, under Section 1053.113, Special District Local Laws Code;

(18) county park rangers commissioned under Subchapter E, Chapter 351, Local Government Code;

(19) investigators employed by the Texas Racing Commission;

(20) officers commissioned under Chapter 554, Occupations Code;

(21) officers commissioned by the governing body of a metropolitan rapid transit authority under Section 451.108, Transportation Code, or by a regional transportation authority under Section 452.110, Transportation Code;

(22) investigators commissioned by the attorney general under Section 402.009, Government Code;

(23) security officers and investigators commissioned as peace officers under Chapter 466, Government Code;

(24) officers appointed by an appellate court under Subchapter F, Chapter 53, Government Code;

(25) officers commissioned by the state fire marshal under Chapter 417, Government Code;

(26) an investigator commissioned by the commissioner of insurance under Section 701.104, Insurance Code;

(27) officers appointed by the inspector general of the Texas Juvenile Justice Department under Section 242.102, Human Resources Code;

(28) officers appointed by the inspector general of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice under Section 493.019, Government Code;

(29) investigators commissioned by the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement under Section 1701.160, Occupations Code;

(30) commission investigators commissioned by the Texas Private Security Board under Section 1702.061, Occupations Code;

(31) the fire marshal and any officers, inspectors, or investigators commissioned by an emergency services district under Chapter 775, Health and Safety Code;

(32) officers commissioned by the State Board of Dental Examiners under Section 254.013, Occupations Code, subject to the limitations imposed by that section;

(33) the fire marshal and any related officers, inspectors, or investigators commissioned by a county under Subchapter B, Chapter 352, Local Government Code;

Text of subdivision as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 870 (H.B. 3981), Sec. 1

(35) fire marshals and any related officers, inspectors, or investigators of a municipality who hold a permanent peace officer license issued under Chapter 1701, Occupations Code; and

Text of subdivision as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 984 (S.B. 2612), Sec. 1

(35) Alamo complex rangers commissioned by the General Land Office under Section 31.0515, Natural Resources Code, subject to the limitations imposed by that section.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1967, 60th Leg., p. 1734, ch. 659, Sec. 5, eff. Aug. 28, 1967; Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 1116, ch. 246, Sec. 3, eff. May 17, 1971; Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 9, ch. 7, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 27, 1973; Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1259, ch. 459, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 27, 1973; Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 480, ch. 204, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975; Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 618, ch. 227, Sec. 2, eff. May 24, 1977; Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1082, ch. 396, Sec.1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 545, ch. 114, Sec. 1, eff. May 17, 1983; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 4358, ch. 699, Sec. 11, eff. June 19, 1983; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 4901, ch. 867, Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 1983; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5303, ch. 974, Sec. 11, eff. Aug. 29, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 384, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 26, 1985; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 907, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 19, Sec. 4, eff. Dec. 4, 1986; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 350, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 277, Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 794, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1104, Sec. 4, eff. June 16, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 4.02, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 228, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 70, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 446, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 544, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 545, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 597, Sec. 57, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 853, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 6, Sec. 6; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 3.01, eff. Nov. 12, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 4.07, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 116, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 339, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 695, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 912, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 10, eff. May 30, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 621, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 729, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1423, Sec. 4.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 90, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 322, Sec. 2, eff. May 29, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 882, Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 974, Sec. 37, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 272, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 442, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 3.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 235, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 474, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 930, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 4.001, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1164 (H.B. 3201), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 3.001, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 402 (S.B. 601), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 584 (H.B. 3815), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 543), Sec. 2, eff. May 2, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 93 (S.B. 686), Sec. 2.01, eff. May 18, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 333 (H.B. 11), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 34 (S.B. 319), Sec. 2, eff. May 14, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 404 (S.B. 1550), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 624 (H.B. 4372), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 870 (H.B. 3981), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 950 (S.B. 1727), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 984 (S.B. 2612), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.121. RAILROAD PEACE OFFICERS. (a) The director of the Department of Public Safety may appoint up to 250 railroad peace officers who are employed by a railroad company to aid law enforcement agencies in the protection of railroad property and the protection of the persons and property of railroad passengers and employees.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c) of this article, a railroad peace officer may make arrests and exercise all authority given peace officers under this code when necessary to prevent or abate the commission of an offense involving injury to passengers and employees of the railroad or damage to railroad property or to protect railroad property or property in the custody or control of the railroad.

(c) A railroad peace officer may not issue a traffic citation for a violation of Chapter 521, Transportation Code, or Subtitle C, Title 7, Transportation Code.

(d) A railroad peace officer is not entitled to state benefits normally provided by the state to a peace officer.

(e) A person may not serve as a railroad peace officer for a railroad company unless:

(1) the Texas Railroad Association submits the person's application for appointment and certification as a railroad peace officer to the director of the Department of Public Safety and to the executive director of the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement;

(2) the director of the department issues the person a certificate of authority to act as a railroad peace officer; and

(3) the executive director of the commission determines that the person meets minimum standards required of peace officers by the commission relating to competence, reliability, education, training, morality, and physical and mental health and issues the person a license as a railroad peace officer; and

(4) the person has met all standards for certification as a peace officer by the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement.

(f) For good cause, the director of the department may revoke a certificate of authority issued under this article and the executive director of the commission may revoke a license issued under this article. Termination of employment with a railroad company, or the revocation of a railroad peace officer license, shall constitute an automatic revocation of a certificate of authority to act as a railroad peace officer.

(g) A railroad company is liable for any act or omission by a person serving as a railroad peace officer for the company that is within the person's scope of employment. Neither the state nor any political subdivision or agency of the state shall be liable for any act or omission by a person appointed as a railroad peace officer. All expenses incurred by the granting or revocation of a certificate of authority to act as a railroad peace officer shall be paid by the employing railroad company.

(h) A railroad peace officer who is a member of a railroad craft may not perform the duties of a member of any other railroad craft during a strike or labor dispute.

(i) The director of the department and the executive director of the commission shall have the authority to promulgate rules necessary for the effective administration and performance of the duties and responsibilities delegated to them by this article.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 531, Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 1985. Subsec. (c) amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 3.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 93 (S.B. 686), Sec. 2.02, eff. May 18, 2013.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Without reference to the amendment of this article, this article was repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Art. 2.122. SPECIAL INVESTIGATORS. (a) The following named criminal investigators of the United States shall not be deemed peace officers, but shall have the powers of arrest, search, and seizure under the laws of this state as to felony offenses only:

(1) Special Agents of the Federal Bureau of Investigation;

(2) Special Agents of the Secret Service;

(3) Special Agents of the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement;

(4) Special Agents of the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives;

(5) Special Agents of the United States Drug Enforcement Administration;

(6) Inspectors of the United States Postal Inspection Service;

(7) Special Agents of the Criminal Investigation Division of the Internal Revenue Service;

(8) Civilian Special Agents of the United States Naval Criminal Investigative Service;

(9) Marshals and Deputy Marshals of the United States Marshals Service;

(10) Special Agents of the United States Department of State, Bureau of Diplomatic Security;

(11) Special Agents of the Treasury Inspector General for Tax Administration;

(12) Special Agents of the Office of Inspector General of the United States Social Security Administration;

(13) Special Agents of the Office of Inspector General of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs;

(14) Special Agents of the Office of Inspector General of the United States Department of Agriculture;

(15) Special Agents of the Office of Export Enforcement of the United States Department of Commerce;

(16) Special Agents of the Criminal Investigation Command of the United States Army;

(17) Special Agents of the Office of Special Investigations of the United States Air Force; and

(18) a police officer with the Office of Security and Law Enforcement of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

(b) An officer or agent designated by the Secretary of Homeland Security under 40 U.S.C. Section 1315 for duty in connection with the protection of property owned or occupied by the federal government and persons on the property is not a peace officer but has the powers of arrest and search and seizure as to any offense under the laws of this state.

(c) A Customs and Border Protection Officer or Border Patrol Agent of the United States Customs and Border Protection or an immigration enforcement agent or deportation officer of the Department of Homeland Security is not a peace officer under the laws of this state but, on the premises of a port facility designated by the commissioner of the United States Customs and Border Protection as a port of entry for arrival in the United States by land transportation from the United Mexican States into the State of Texas or at a permanent established border patrol traffic check point, has the authority to detain a person pending transfer without unnecessary delay to a peace officer if the agent or officer has probable cause to believe that the person has engaged in conduct that is a violation of Section 49.02, 49.04, 49.07, or 49.08, Penal Code, regardless of whether the violation may be disposed of in a criminal proceeding or a juvenile justice proceeding.

(c-1) In addition to the power granted under Subsection (c), a Border Patrol Agent of the United States Customs and Border Protection who completed the training program described by Section 411.02093, Government Code, has the powers of arrest and search and seizure as to any felony offense under the laws of this state if the arrest, search, or seizure:

(1) occurs on the premises of a port facility designated by the commissioner of the United States Customs and Border Protection as a port of entry or at a border patrol traffic checkpoint; and

(2) is incident to a detainment under federal law.

(d) A commissioned law enforcement officer of the National Park Service is not a peace officer under the laws of this state, except that the officer has the powers of arrest, search, and seizure as to any offense under the laws of this state committed within the boundaries of a national park or national recreation area. In this subsection, "national park or national recreation area" means a national park or national recreation area included in the National Park System as defined by 16 U.S.C. Section 1c(a).

(e) A Special Agent or Law Enforcement Officer of the United States Forest Service is not a peace officer under the laws of this state, except that the agent or officer has the powers of arrest, search, and seizure as to any offense under the laws of this state committed within the National Forest System. In this subsection, "National Forest System" has the meaning assigned by 16 U.S.C. Section 1609.

(f) Security personnel working at a commercial nuclear power plant, including contract security personnel, trained and qualified under a security plan approved by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, are not peace officers under the laws of this state, except that such personnel have the powers of arrest, search, and seizure, including the powers under Section 9.51, Penal Code, while in the performance of their duties on the premises of a commercial nuclear power plant site or under agreements entered into with local law enforcement regarding areas surrounding the plant site.

(g) In addition to the powers of arrest, search, and seizure under Subsection (a), a Special Agent of the Secret Service protecting a person described by 18 U.S.C. Section 3056(a) or investigating a threat against a person described by 18 U.S.C. Section 3056(a) has the powers of arrest, search, and seizure as to:

(1) misdemeanor offenses under the laws of this state; and

(2) any criminal offense under federal law.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 543, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from art. 2.121 and amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 503, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 854, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 841, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 927, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1993; Subsec. (a) amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 717, Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 1997; Subsec. (c) added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 290, Sec. 1, eff. May 26, 1997; Subsec. (a) amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 197, Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 1999; Subsec. (c) amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 863, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999; Subsec. (d) added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 197, Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 1999; added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 628, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999; Subsec. (e) relettered from subsec. (d) by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(7), eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Subsec. (f) added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1237, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1337 (S.B. 9), Sec. 5, eff. June 18, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 732 (S.B. 390), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1223 (S.B. 530), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1319 (S.B. 150), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 741 (S.B. 284), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1311 (H.B. 3863), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 904 (H.B. 3452), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 196 (S.B. 602), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.123. ADJUNCT POLICE OFFICERS. (a) Within counties under 200,000 population, the chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of the county, if the institution is outside the corporate limits of a municipality, that has jurisdiction over the geographical area of a private institution of higher education, provided the governing board of such institution consents, may appoint up to 50 peace officers who are commissioned under Section 51.212, Education Code, and who are employed by a private institution of higher education located in the municipality or county, to serve as adjunct police officers of the municipality or county. Officers appointed under this article shall aid law enforcement agencies in the protection of the municipality or county in a geographical area that is designated by agreement on an annual basis between the appointing chief of police or sheriff and the private institution.

(b) The geographical area that is subject to designation under Subsection (a) of this article may include only the private institution's campus area and an area that:

(1) is adjacent to the campus of the private institution;

(2) does not extend further than a distance of one mile from the perimeter of the campus of the private institution; and

(3) is inhabited primarily by students or employees of the private institution.

(c) A peace officer serving as an adjunct police officer may make arrests and exercise all authority given peace officers under this code only within the geographical area designated by agreement between the appointing chief of police or sheriff and the private institution.

(d) A peace officer serving as an adjunct police officer has all the rights, privileges, and immunities of a peace officer but is not entitled to state compensation and retirement benefits normally provided by the state to a peace officer.

(e) A person may not serve as an adjunct police officer for a municipality or county unless:

(1) the institution of higher education submits the person's application for appointment and certification as an adjunct police officer to the chief of police of the municipality or, if outside a municipality, the sheriff of the county that has jurisdiction over the geographical area of the institution;

(2) the chief of police of the municipality or sheriff of the county to whom the application was made issues the person a certificate of authority to act as an adjunct police officer; and

(3) the person undergoes any additional training required for that person to meet the training standards of the municipality or county for peace officers employed by the municipality or county.

(f) For good cause, the chief of police or sheriff may revoke a certificate of authority issued under this article.

(g) A private institution of higher education is liable for any act or omission by a person while serving as an adjunct police officer outside of the campus of the institution in the same manner as the municipality or county governing that geographical area is liable for any act or omission of a peace officer employed by the municipality or county. This subsection shall not be construed to act as a limitation on the liability of a municipality or county for the acts or omissions of a person serving as an adjunct police officer.

(h) The employing institution shall pay all expenses incurred by the municipality or county in granting or revoking a certificate of authority to act as an adjunct police officer under this article.

(i) This article does not affect any duty of the municipality or county to provide law enforcement services to a geographical area designated under Subsection (a) of this article.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1128, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.124. PEACE OFFICERS FROM ADJOINING STATES. (a) A commissioned peace officer of a state of the United States of America adjoining this state, while the officer is in this state, has under this subsection the same powers, duties, and immunities as a peace officer of this state who is acting in the discharge of an official duty, but only:

(1) during a time in which:

(A) the peace officer from the adjoining state has physical custody of an inmate or criminal defendant and is transporting the inmate or defendant from a county in the adjoining state that is on the border between the two states to a hospital or other medical facility in a county in this state that is on the border between the two states; or

(B) the peace officer has physical custody of the inmate or defendant and is returning the inmate or defendant from the hospital or facility to the county in the adjoining state; and

(2) to the extent necessary to:

(A) maintain physical custody of the inmate or defendant while transporting the inmate or defendant; or

(B) regain physical custody of the inmate or defendant if the inmate or defendant escapes while being transported.

(b) A commissioned peace officer of a state of the United States of America adjoining this state, while the officer is in this state, has under this subsection the same powers, duties, and immunities as a peace officer of this state who is acting in the discharge of an official duty, but only in a municipality some part of the municipal limits of which are within one mile of the boundary between this state and the adjoining state and only at a time the peace officer is regularly assigned to duty in a county, parish, or municipality that adjoins this state. A peace officer described by this subsection may also as part of the officer's powers in this state enforce the ordinances of a Texas municipality described by this subsection but only after the governing body of the municipality authorizes that enforcement by majority vote at an open meeting.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 156, Sec. 1, eff. May 19, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.125. SPECIAL RANGERS OF TEXAS AND SOUTHWESTERN CATTLE RAISERS ASSOCIATION. (a) The director of the Department of Public Safety may appoint up to 50 special rangers who are employed by the Texas and Southwestern Cattle Raisers Association to aid law enforcement agencies in the investigation of the theft of livestock or related property.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c) of this article, a special ranger may make arrests and exercise all authority given peace officers under this code when necessary to prevent or abate the commission of an offense involving livestock or related property.

(c) A special ranger may not issue a traffic citation for a violation of Chapter 521, Transportation Code, or Subtitle C, Title 7, Transportation Code.

(d) A special ranger is not entitled to state benefits normally provided by the state to a peace officer.

(e) A person may not serve as a special ranger unless:

(1) the Texas and Southwestern Cattle Raisers Association submits the person's application for appointment and certification as a special ranger to the director of the Department of Public Safety and to the executive director of the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement;

(2) the director of the department issues the person a certificate of authority to act as a special ranger;

(3) the executive director of the commission determines that the person meets minimum standards required of peace officers by the commission relating to competence, reliability, education, training, morality, and physical and mental health and issues the person a license as a special ranger; and

(4) the person has met all standards for certification as a peace officer by the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement.

(f) For good cause, the director of the department may revoke a certificate of authority issued under this article and the executive director of the commission may revoke a license issued under this article. Termination of employment with the association, or the revocation of a special ranger license, shall constitute an automatic revocation of a certificate of authority to act as a special ranger.

(g) The Texas and Southwestern Cattle Raisers Association is liable for any act or omission by a person serving as a special ranger for the association that is within the person's scope of employment. Neither the state nor any political subdivision or agency of the state shall be liable for any act or omission by a person appointed as a special ranger. All expenses incurred by the granting or revocation of a certificate of authority to act as a special ranger shall be paid by the association.

(h) The director of the department and the executive director of the commission shall have the authority to promulgate rules necessary for the effective administration and performance of the duties and responsibilities delegated to them by this article.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 209 (H.B. 1695), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 93 (S.B. 686), Sec. 2.03, eff. May 18, 2013.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.126. PEACE OFFICERS COMMISSIONED BY THE ALABAMA-COUSHATTA TRIBE OF TEXAS AND THE KICKAPOO TRADITIONAL TRIBE OF TEXAS. (a) The tribal council of the Alabama-Coushatta Tribe of Texas or the tribal council of the Kickapoo Traditional Tribe of Texas is authorized to employ and commission peace officers for the purpose of enforcing state law within the boundaries of the tribe's reservation.

(b) Within the boundaries of the tribe's reservation, a peace officer commissioned under this article:

(1) is vested with all the powers, privileges, and immunities of peace officers;

(2) may, in accordance with Chapter 14, arrest without a warrant any person who violates a law of the state; and

(3) may enforce all traffic laws on streets and highways.

(c) Outside the boundaries of the tribe's reservation, a peace officer commissioned under this article is vested with all the powers, privileges, and immunities of peace officers and may arrest any person who violates any law of the state if the peace officer:

(1) is summoned by another law enforcement agency to provide assistance; or

(2) is assisting another law enforcement agency.

(d) Any officer assigned to duty and commissioned under this article shall take and file the oath required of peace officers and shall execute and file a good and sufficient bond in the sum of $1,000, payable to the governor, with two or more good and sufficient sureties, conditioned that the officer will fairly, impartially, and faithfully perform the duties as may be required of the officer by law. The bond may be sued on from time to time in the name of the person injured until the whole amount is recovered.

(e) Any person commissioned under this article must:

(1) meet the minimum standards required of peace officers by the commission relating to competence, reliability, education, training, morality, and physical and mental health; and

(2) meet all standards for certification as a peace officer by the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement.

(f) A peace officer commissioned under this article is not entitled to state benefits normally provided by the state to a peace officer.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1344 (S.B. 1378), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 93 (S.B. 686), Sec. 2.04, eff. May 18, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 681 (S.B. 2143), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 681 (S.B. 2143), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.127. SCHOOL MARSHALS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a school marshal may:

(1) make arrests and exercise all authority given peace officers under this code, subject to written regulations adopted by:

(A) the board of trustees of a school district or the governing body of an open-enrollment charter school under Section 37.0811, Education Code;

(B) the governing body of a private school under Section 37.0813, Education Code; or

(C) the governing board of a public junior college under Section 51.220, Education Code; and

(2) only act as necessary to prevent or abate the commission of an offense that threatens serious bodily injury or death of students, faculty, or visitors on school premises.

(a-1) In this section, "private school" means a school that:

(1) offers a course of instruction for students in one or more grades from prekindergarten through grade 12;

(2) is not operated by a governmental entity; and

(3) is not a school whose students meet the definition provided by Section 29.916(a)(1), Education Code.

(b) A school marshal may not issue a traffic citation for a violation of Chapter 521, Transportation Code, or Subtitle C, Title 7, Transportation Code.

(c) A school marshal is not entitled to state benefits normally provided by the state to a peace officer.

(d) A person may not serve as a school marshal unless the person is:

(1) licensed under Section 1701.260, Occupations Code; and

(2) appointed by:

(A) the board of trustees of a school district or the governing body of an open-enrollment charter school under Section 37.0811, Education Code;

(B) the governing body of a private school under Section 37.0813, Education Code; or

(C) the governing board of a public junior college under Section 51.220, Education Code.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 655 (H.B. 1009), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1144 (S.B. 386), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 988 (H.B. 867), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2017.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Without reference to the amendment of this article, this article was repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Art. 2.13. DUTIES AND POWERS. (a) It is the duty of every peace officer to preserve the peace within the officer's jurisdiction. To effect this purpose, the officer shall use all lawful means.

(b) The officer shall:

(1) in every case authorized by the provisions of this Code, interfere without warrant to prevent or suppress crime;

(2) execute all lawful process issued to the officer by any magistrate or court;

(3) give notice to some magistrate of all offenses committed within the officer's jurisdiction, where the officer has good reason to believe there has been a violation of the penal law; and

(4) arrest offenders without warrant in every case where the officer is authorized by law, in order that they may be taken before the proper magistrate or court and be tried.

(c) It is the duty of every officer to take possession of a child under Article 63.00905(g).

(d) Subject to Subsection (e), in the course of investigating an alleged criminal offense, a peace officer may inquire as to the nationality or immigration status of a victim of or witness to the offense only if the officer determines that the inquiry is necessary to:

(1) investigate the offense; or

(2) provide the victim or witness with information about federal visas designed to protect individuals providing assistance to law enforcement.

(e) Subsection (d) does not prevent a peace officer from:

(1) conducting a separate investigation of any other alleged criminal offense; or

(2) inquiring as to the nationality or immigration status of a victim of or witness to a criminal offense if the officer has probable cause to believe that the victim or witness has engaged in specific conduct constituting a separate criminal offense.

(f) On a request made by that office, a peace officer shall execute an emergency detention order issued by the Texas Civil Commitment Office under Section 841.0837, Health and Safety Code.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 685, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Subsec. (c) amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 5.0005, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 4, Sec. 6.01, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 4), Sec. 6.01, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 34 (S.B. 1576), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(2), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2660), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 979 (S.B. 2429), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.1305. CARRYING WEAPON ON CERTAIN PREMISES. (a) An establishment serving the public may not prohibit or otherwise restrict a peace officer or special investigator from carrying on the establishment's premises a weapon that the peace officer or special investigator is otherwise authorized to carry, regardless of whether the peace officer or special investigator is engaged in the actual discharge of the officer's or investigator's duties while carrying the weapon.

(b) For purposes of this article:

(1) "Establishment serving the public" means:

(A) a hotel, motel, or other place of lodging;

(B) a restaurant or other place where food is offered for sale to the public;

(C) a retail business or other commercial establishment or an office building to which the general public is invited;

(D) a sports venue; and

(E) any other place of public accommodation, amusement, convenience, or resort to which the general public or any classification of persons from the general public is regularly, normally, or customarily invited.

(2) "Sports venue" means an arena, coliseum, stadium, or other type of area or facility that is primarily used or is planned for primary use for one or more professional or amateur sports or athletics events and for which a fee is charged or is planned to be charged for admission to the sports or athletics events, other than occasional civic, charitable, or promotional events.

(c) An establishment serving the public that violates this article is subject to a civil penalty in the amount of $1,000 for each violation. The attorney general may sue to collect a civil penalty under this subsection. Money collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the general revenue fund.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 124 (H.B. 873), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 484 (H.B. 2164), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.131. RACIAL PROFILING PROHIBITED. A peace officer may not engage in racial profiling.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 947, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.132. LAW ENFORCEMENT POLICY ON RACIAL PROFILING. (a) In this article:

(1) "Law enforcement agency" means an agency of the state, or of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state, that employs peace officers who make motor vehicle stops in the routine performance of the officers' official duties.

(2) "Motor vehicle stop" means an occasion in which a peace officer stops a motor vehicle for an alleged violation of a law or ordinance.

(3) "Race or ethnicity" means the following categories:

(A) Alaska native or American Indian;

(B) Asian or Pacific Islander;

(C) black;

(D) white; and

(E) Hispanic or Latino.

(b) Each law enforcement agency in this state shall adopt a detailed written policy on racial profiling. The policy must:

(1) clearly define acts constituting racial profiling;

(2) strictly prohibit peace officers employed by the agency from engaging in racial profiling;

(3) implement a process by which an individual may file a complaint with the agency if the individual believes that a peace officer employed by the agency has engaged in racial profiling with respect to the individual;

(4) provide public education relating to the agency's compliment and complaint process, including providing the telephone number, mailing address, and e-mail address to make a compliment or complaint with respect to each ticket, citation, or warning issued by a peace officer;

(5) require appropriate corrective action to be taken against a peace officer employed by the agency who, after an investigation, is shown to have engaged in racial profiling in violation of the agency's policy adopted under this article;

(6) require collection of information relating to motor vehicle stops in which a ticket, citation, or warning is issued and to arrests made as a result of those stops, including information relating to:

(A) the race or ethnicity of the individual detained;

(B) whether a search was conducted and, if so, whether the individual detained consented to the search;

(C) whether the peace officer knew the race or ethnicity of the individual detained before detaining that individual;

(D) whether the peace officer used physical force that resulted in bodily injury, as that term is defined by Section 1.07, Penal Code, during the stop;

(E) the location of the stop; and

(F) the reason for the stop; and

(7) require the chief administrator of the agency, regardless of whether the administrator is elected, employed, or appointed, to submit an annual report of the information collected under Subdivision (6) to:

(A) the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement; and

(B) the governing body of each county or municipality served by the agency, if the agency is an agency of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state.

(c) The data collected as a result of the reporting requirements of this article shall not constitute prima facie evidence of racial profiling.

(d) On adoption of a policy under Subsection (b), a law enforcement agency shall examine the feasibility of installing video camera and transmitter-activated equipment in each agency law enforcement motor vehicle regularly used to make motor vehicle stops and transmitter-activated equipment in each agency law enforcement motorcycle regularly used to make motor vehicle stops. The agency also shall examine the feasibility of equipping each peace officer who regularly detains or stops motor vehicles with a body worn camera, as that term is defined by Section 1701.651, Occupations Code. If a law enforcement agency installs video or audio equipment or equips peace officers with body worn cameras as provided by this subsection, the policy adopted by the agency under Subsection (b) must include standards for reviewing video and audio documentation.

(e) A report required under Subsection (b)(7) may not include identifying information about a peace officer who makes a motor vehicle stop or about an individual who is stopped or arrested by a peace officer. This subsection does not affect the collection of information as required by a policy under Subsection (b)(6).

(f) On the commencement of an investigation by a law enforcement agency of a complaint described by Subsection (b)(3) in which a video or audio recording of the occurrence on which the complaint is based was made, the agency shall promptly provide a copy of the recording to the peace officer who is the subject of the complaint on written request by the officer.

(g) On a finding by the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement that the chief administrator of a law enforcement agency intentionally failed to submit a report required under Subsection (b)(7), the commission shall begin disciplinary procedures against the chief administrator.

(h) A law enforcement agency shall review the data collected under Subsection (b)(6) to identify any improvements the agency could make in its practices and policies regarding motor vehicle stops.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 947, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1172 (H.B. 3389), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 93 (S.B. 686), Sec. 2.05, eff. May 18, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 173 (H.B. 3051), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 950 (S.B. 1849), Sec. 5.01, eff. September 1, 2017.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.133. REPORTS REQUIRED FOR MOTOR VEHICLE STOPS. (a) In this article, "race or ethnicity" has the meaning assigned by Article 2.132(a).

(b) A peace officer who stops a motor vehicle for an alleged violation of a law or ordinance shall report to the law enforcement agency that employs the officer information relating to the stop, including:

(1) a physical description of any person operating the motor vehicle who is detained as a result of the stop, including:

(A) the person's gender; and

(B) the person's race or ethnicity, as stated by the person or, if the person does not state the person's race or ethnicity, as determined by the officer to the best of the officer's ability;

(2) the initial reason for the stop;

(3) whether the officer conducted a search as a result of the stop and, if so, whether the person detained consented to the search;

(4) whether any contraband or other evidence was discovered in the course of the search and a description of the contraband or evidence;

(5) the reason for the search, including whether:

(A) any contraband or other evidence was in plain view;

(B) any probable cause or reasonable suspicion existed to perform the search; or

(C) the search was performed as a result of the towing of the motor vehicle or the arrest of any person in the motor vehicle;

(6) whether the officer made an arrest as a result of the stop or the search, including a statement of whether the arrest was based on a violation of the Penal Code, a violation of a traffic law or ordinance, or an outstanding warrant and a statement of the offense charged;

(7) the street address or approximate location of the stop;

(8) whether the officer issued a verbal or written warning or a ticket or citation as a result of the stop; and

(9) whether the officer used physical force that resulted in bodily injury, as that term is defined by Section 1.07, Penal Code, during the stop.

(c) The chief administrator of a law enforcement agency, regardless of whether the administrator is elected, employed, or appointed, is responsible for auditing reports under Subsection (b) to ensure that the race or ethnicity of the person operating the motor vehicle is being reported.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 947, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1172 (H.B. 3389), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 950 (S.B. 1849), Sec. 5.02, eff. September 1, 2017.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.134. COMPILATION AND ANALYSIS OF INFORMATION COLLECTED. (a) In this article:

(1) "Motor vehicle stop" has the meaning assigned by Article 2.132(a).

(2) "Race or ethnicity" has the meaning assigned by Article 2.132(a).

(b) A law enforcement agency shall compile and analyze the information contained in each report received by the agency under Article 2.133. Not later than March 1 of each year, each law enforcement agency shall submit a report containing the incident-based data compiled during the previous calendar year to the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement and, if the law enforcement agency is a local law enforcement agency, to the governing body of each county or municipality served by the agency.

(c) A report required under Subsection (b) must be submitted by the chief administrator of the law enforcement agency, regardless of whether the administrator is elected, employed, or appointed, and must include:

(1) a comparative analysis of the information compiled under Article 2.133 to:

(A) evaluate and compare the number of motor vehicle stops, within the applicable jurisdiction, of persons who are recognized as racial or ethnic minorities and persons who are not recognized as racial or ethnic minorities;

(B) examine the disposition of motor vehicle stops made by officers employed by the agency, categorized according to the race or ethnicity of the affected persons, as appropriate, including any searches resulting from stops within the applicable jurisdiction; and

(C) evaluate and compare the number of searches resulting from motor vehicle stops within the applicable jurisdiction and whether contraband or other evidence was discovered in the course of those searches; and

(2) information relating to each complaint filed with the agency alleging that a peace officer employed by the agency has engaged in racial profiling.

(d) A report required under Subsection (b) may not include identifying information about a peace officer who makes a motor vehicle stop or about an individual who is stopped or arrested by a peace officer. This subsection does not affect the reporting of information required under Article 2.133(b)(1).

(e) The Texas Commission on Law Enforcement, in accordance with Section 1701.162, Occupations Code, shall develop guidelines for compiling and reporting information as required by this article.

(f) The data collected as a result of the reporting requirements of this article shall not constitute prima facie evidence of racial profiling.

(g) On a finding by the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement that the chief administrator of a law enforcement agency intentionally failed to submit a report required under Subsection (b), the commission shall begin disciplinary procedures against the chief administrator.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 947, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1172 (H.B. 3389), Sec. 27, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 93 (S.B. 686), Sec. 2.06, eff. May 18, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 950 (S.B. 1849), Sec. 5.03, eff. September 1, 2017.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.136. LIABILITY. A peace officer is not liable for damages arising from an act relating to the collection or reporting of information as required by Article 2.133 or under a policy adopted under Article 2.132.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 947, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.137. PROVISION OF FUNDING OR EQUIPMENT. (a) The Department of Public Safety shall adopt rules for providing funds or video and audio equipment to law enforcement agencies for the purpose of installing video and audio equipment in law enforcement motor vehicles and motorcycles or equipping peace officers with body worn cameras, including specifying criteria to prioritize funding or equipment provided to law enforcement agencies. The criteria may include consideration of tax effort, financial hardship, available revenue, and budget surpluses. The criteria must give priority to:

(1) law enforcement agencies that employ peace officers whose primary duty is traffic enforcement;

(2) smaller jurisdictions; and

(3) municipal and county law enforcement agencies.

(b) The Department of Public Safety shall collaborate with an institution of higher education to identify law enforcement agencies that need funds or video and audio equipment for the purpose of installing video and audio equipment in law enforcement motor vehicles and motorcycles or equipping peace officers with body worn cameras. The collaboration may include the use of a survey to assist in developing criteria to prioritize funding or equipment provided to law enforcement agencies.

(c) To receive funds or video and audio equipment from the state for the purpose of installing video and audio equipment in law enforcement motor vehicles and motorcycles or equipping peace officers with body worn cameras, the governing body of a county or municipality, in conjunction with the law enforcement agency serving the county or municipality, shall certify to the Department of Public Safety that the law enforcement agency needs funds or video and audio equipment for that purpose.

(d) On receipt of funds or video and audio equipment from the state for the purpose of installing video and audio equipment in law enforcement motor vehicles and motorcycles or equipping peace officers with body worn cameras, the governing body of a county or municipality, in conjunction with the law enforcement agency serving the county or municipality, shall certify to the Department of Public Safety that the law enforcement agency has taken the necessary actions to use and is using video and audio equipment and body worn cameras for those purposes.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 947, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 950 (S.B. 1849), Sec. 5.04, eff. September 1, 2017.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.138. RULES. The Department of Public Safety may adopt rules to implement Articles 2.131-2.137.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 947, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.1385. CIVIL PENALTY. (a) If the chief administrator of a local law enforcement agency intentionally fails to submit the incident-based data as required by Article 2.134, the agency is liable to the state for a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $5,000 for each violation. The attorney general may sue to collect a civil penalty under this subsection.

(b) From money appropriated to the agency for the administration of the agency, the executive director of a state law enforcement agency that intentionally fails to submit the incident-based data as required by Article 2.134 shall remit to the comptroller the amount of $1,000 for each violation.

(c) Money collected under this article shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the general revenue fund.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1172 (H.B. 3389), Sec. 29, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 950 (S.B. 1849), Sec. 5.05, eff. September 1, 2017.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.1386. EYEWITNESS IDENTIFICATION PROTOCOLS. (a) In this article, "law enforcement agency" means an agency of the state or an agency of a political subdivision of the state authorized by law to employ peace officers.

(b) The Texas Commission on Law Enforcement shall establish a comprehensive education and training program on eyewitness identification, including material regarding variables that affect a witness's vision and memory, practices for minimizing contamination, and effective eyewitness identification protocols.

(c) Each law enforcement agency shall require each peace officer who is employed by the agency and who performs eyewitness identification procedures to complete the education and training described by Subsection (b).

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 686 (H.B. 34), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.1387. INTERVENTION REQUIRED FOR EXCESSIVE FORCE; REPORT REQUIRED. (a) A peace officer has a duty to intervene to stop or prevent another peace officer from using force against a person suspected of committing an offense if:

(1) the amount of force exceeds that which is reasonable under the circumstances; and

(2) the officer knows or should know that the other officer's use of force:

(A) violates state or federal law;

(B) puts a person at risk of bodily injury, as that term is defined by Section 1.07, Penal Code, and is not immediately necessary to avoid imminent bodily injury to a peace officer or other person; and

(C) is not required to apprehend the person suspected of committing an offense.

(b) A peace officer who witnesses the use of excessive force by another peace officer shall promptly make a detailed report of the incident and deliver the report to the supervisor of the peace officer making the report.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 534 (S.B. 69), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.139. REPORTS REQUIRED FOR OFFICER-INVOLVED INJURIES OR DEATHS. (a) In this article:

(1) "Deadly weapon" means:

(A) a firearm or any object manifestly designed, made, or adapted for the purpose of inflicting death or serious bodily injury; or

(B) any object that in the manner of its use or intended use is capable of causing death or serious bodily injury.

(2) "Officer-involved injury or death" means an incident during which a peace officer discharges a firearm causing injury or death to another.

(b) The office of the attorney general by rule shall create a written and electronic form for the reporting by law enforcement agencies of an officer-involved injury or death. The form must include spaces to report only the following information:

(1) the date on which the incident occurred;

(2) the location where the incident occurred;

(3) the age, gender, and race or ethnicity of each peace officer involved in the incident;

(4) if known, the age, gender, and race or ethnicity of each injured or deceased person involved in the incident;

(5) whether the person was injured or died as a result of the incident;

(6) whether each injured or deceased person used, exhibited, or was carrying a deadly weapon during the incident;

(7) whether each peace officer involved in the incident was on duty during the incident;

(8) whether each peace officer involved in the incident was responding to an emergency call or a request for assistance and, if so, whether the officer responded to that call or request with one or more other peace officers; and

(9) whether the incident occurred during or as a result of:

(A) the execution of a warrant; or

(B) a hostage, barricade, or other emergency situation.

(c) Not later than the 30th day after the date of an officer-involved injury or death, the law enforcement agency employing an officer involved in the incident must complete and submit a written or electronic report, using the form created under Subsection (b), to the office of the attorney general. The report must include all information described in Subsection (b).

(d) Not later than the fifth day after the date of receipt of a report submitted under Subsection (c), the office of the attorney general shall post a copy of the report on the office's Internet website.

(e) Not later than March 1 of each year, the office of the attorney general shall submit a report regarding all officer-involved injuries or deaths that occurred during the preceding year to the governor and the standing legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over criminal justice matters. The report must include:

(1) the total number of officer-involved injuries or deaths;

(2) a summary of the reports submitted to the office under this article; and

(3) a copy of each report submitted to the office under this article.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 516 (H.B. 1036), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 808 (H.B. 245), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.1395. REPORTS REQUIRED FOR CERTAIN INJURIES OR DEATHS OF PEACE OFFICERS. (a) The office of the attorney general by rule shall create a written and electronic form for the reporting by law enforcement agencies of incidents in which, while a peace officer is performing an official duty, a person who is not a peace officer discharges a firearm and causes injury or death to the officer. The form must include spaces to report only the following information:

(1) the date on which the incident occurred;

(2) the location where the incident occurred;

(3) the age, gender, and race or ethnicity of each injured or deceased peace officer involved in the incident;

(4) if known, the age, gender, and race or ethnicity of each person who discharged a firearm and caused injury or death to a peace officer involved in the incident; and

(5) whether the officer or any other person was injured or died as a result of the incident.

(b) Not later than the 30th day after the date of the occurrence of an incident described by Subsection (a), the law enforcement agency employing the injured or deceased officer at the time of the incident must complete and submit a written or electronic report, using the form created under that subsection, to the office of the attorney general. The report must include all information described in Subsection (a).

(c) Not later than March 1 of each year, the office of the attorney general shall submit a report regarding all incidents described by Subsection (a) that occurred during the preceding year to the governor and the standing legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over criminal justice matters. The report must include:

(1) the total number of incidents that occurred;

(2) a summary of the reports submitted to the office under this article; and

(3) a copy of each report submitted to the office under this article.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 516 (H.B. 1036), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 808 (H.B. 245), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.13951. NOTICE OF VIOLATION OF REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR CERTAIN INJURIES OR DEATHS; CIVIL PENALTY. (a) The office of the attorney general shall conduct an investigation after receiving a written and signed report, on a form prescribed by the office, asserting that a law enforcement agency failed to submit a report required by Article 2.139 or 2.1395. If the office determines that the law enforcement agency failed to submit the report, the office shall provide notice of the failure to the agency. The notice must summarize the applicable reporting requirement and state that the agency may be subject to a civil penalty as provided by Subsection (b) or (c), as applicable.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), a law enforcement agency that fails to submit the required report on or before the seventh day after the date of receiving notice under Subsection (a) is liable for a civil penalty in the amount of $1,000 for each day after the seventh day that the agency fails to submit the report.

(c) Beginning on the day after the date of receiving notice under Subsection (a), a law enforcement agency that, in the five-year period preceding the date the agency received the notice, has been liable for a civil penalty under Subsection (b) or this subsection is liable for a civil penalty for each day the agency fails to submit the required report. The amount of a civil penalty under this subsection is $10,000 for the first day and $1,000 for each additional day that the agency fails to submit the report.

(d) The attorney general may sue to collect a civil penalty under this article.

(e) A civil penalty collected under this article shall be deposited to the credit of the compensation to victims of crime fund established under Subchapter J, Chapter 56B.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 808 (H.B. 245), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 469 (H.B. 4173), Sec. 2.05, eff. January 1, 2021.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.1396. VIDEO RECORDINGS OF ARRESTS FOR INTOXICATION OFFENSES. A person stopped or arrested on suspicion of an offense under Section 49.04, 49.045, 49.07, or 49.08, Penal Code, is entitled to receive from a law enforcement agency employing the peace officer who made the stop or arrest a copy of any video made by or at the direction of the officer that contains footage of:

(1) the stop;

(2) the arrest;

(3) the conduct of the person stopped during any interaction with the officer, including during the administration of a field sobriety test; or

(4) a procedure in which a specimen of the person's breath or blood is taken.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1124 (H.B. 3791), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Code of Criminal Procedure, Art/Sec 2.139 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(3), eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Code of Criminal Procedure, Art/Sec 2.139 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 808 (H.B. 245), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2017.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.1397. DUTIES OF LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY FILING CASE. (a) In this article:

(1) "Attorney representing the state" means an attorney authorized by law to represent the state in a criminal case, including a district attorney, criminal district attorney, or county attorney with criminal jurisdiction. The term does not include an attorney representing the state in a justice or municipal court under Chapter 45.

(2) "Law enforcement agency" means an agency of the state or an agency of a political subdivision of the state authorized by law to employ peace officers.

(b) A law enforcement agency filing a case with the attorney representing the state shall submit to the attorney representing the state a written statement by an agency employee with knowledge of the case acknowledging that all documents, items, and information in the possession of the agency that are required to be disclosed to the defendant in the case under Article 39.14 have been disclosed to the attorney representing the state.

(c) If at any time after the case is filed with the attorney representing the state the law enforcement agency discovers or acquires any additional document, item, or information required to be disclosed to the defendant under Article 39.14, an agency employee shall promptly disclose the document, item, or information to the attorney representing the state.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 509 (S.B. 111), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Art. 2.1398. DUTIES OF PEACE OFFICER INVESTIGATING STALKING, HARASSMENT, OR TERRORISTIC THREAT. (a) In this article:

(1) "Harassment" means any conduct that constitutes an offense under Section 42.07, Penal Code.

(2) "Stalking" means any conduct that constitutes an offense under Section 42.072, Penal Code.

(3) "Terroristic threat" means any conduct that constitutes an offense under Section 22.07, Penal Code.

(b) A peace officer who investigates an allegation of stalking, harassment, or terroristic threat shall advise any possible adult victim of all reasonable means to prevent the occurrence of further offenses, including by providing the written notice adopted by the Health and Human Services Commission under Section 51A.003, Human Resources Code. In addition to the required notice under this subsection, a peace officer may provide to the possible victim any available written information regarding local resources for victims of stalking, harassment, or terroristic threat.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 24 (S.B. 1325), Sec. 3, eff. May 13, 2023.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.14. MAY SUMMON AID. Whenever a peace officer meets with resistance in discharging any duty imposed upon him by law, he shall summon a sufficient number of citizens of his county to overcome the resistance; and all persons summoned are bound to obey.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.15. PERSON REFUSING TO AID. The peace officer who has summoned any person to assist him in performing any duty shall report such person, if he refuse to obey, to the proper district or county attorney, in order that he may be prosecuted for the offense.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.16. NEGLECTING TO EXECUTE PROCESS. If any sheriff or other officer shall wilfully refuse or fail from neglect to execute any summons, subpoena or attachment for a witness, or any other legal process which it is made his duty by law to execute, he shall be liable to a fine for contempt not less than ten nor more than two hundred dollars, at the discretion of the court. The payment of such fine shall be enforced in the same manner as fines for contempt in civil cases.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.17. CONSERVATOR OF THE PEACE. Each sheriff shall be a conservator of the peace in his county, and shall arrest all offenders against the laws of the State, in his view or hearing, and take them before the proper court for examination or trial. He shall quell and suppress all assaults and batteries, affrays, insurrections and unlawful assemblies. He shall apprehend and commit to jail all offenders, until an examination or trial can be had.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.18. CUSTODY OF PRISONERS. When a prisoner is committed to jail by warrant from a magistrate or court, he shall be placed in jail by the sheriff. It is a violation of duty on the part of any sheriff to permit a defendant so committed to remain out of jail, except that he may, when a defendant is committed for want of bail, or when he arrests in a bailable case, give the person arrested a reasonable time to procure bail; but he shall so guard the accused as to prevent escape.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.19. REPORT AS TO PRISONERS. On the first day of each month, the sheriff shall give notice, in writing, to the district or county attorney, where there be one, as to all prisoners in his custody, naming them, and of the authority under which he detains them.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.195. REPORT OF WARRANT OR CAPIAS INFORMATION. Not later than the 30th day after the date the court clerk issues the warrant or capias, the sheriff:

(1) shall report to the national crime information center each warrant or capias issued for a defendant charged with a felony who fails to appear in court when summoned; and

(2) may report to the national crime information center each warrant or capias issued for a defendant charged with a misdemeanor other than a Class C misdemeanor who fails to appear in court when summoned.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 578 (S.B. 2438), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 531 (H.B. 2472), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.20. DEPUTY. Wherever a duty is imposed by this Code upon the sheriff, the same duty may lawfully be performed by his deputy. When there is no sheriff in a county, the duties of that office, as to all proceedings under the criminal law, devolve upon the officer who, under the law, is empowered to discharge the duties of sheriff, in case of vacancy in the office.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Without reference to the amendment of this article, this article was repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Art. 2.21. DUTY OF CLERKS. (a) In a criminal proceeding, a clerk of the district or county court shall:

(1) receive and file all papers;

(2) receive all exhibits at the conclusion of the proceeding;

(3) issue all process;

(4) accept and file electronic documents received from the defendant, if the clerk accepts electronic documents from an attorney representing the state;

(5) accept and file digital multimedia evidence received from the defendant, if the clerk accepts digital multimedia evidence from an attorney representing the state; and

(6) perform all other duties imposed on the clerk by law.

(a-1) A district clerk is exempt from the requirements of Subsections (a)(4) and (5) if the electronic filing system used by the clerk for accepting electronic documents or electronic digital media from an attorney representing the state does not have the capability of accepting electronic filings from a defendant and the system was established or procured before June 1, 2009. If the electronic filing system described by this subsection is substantially upgraded or is replaced with a new system, the exemption provided by this subsection is no longer applicable.

(b) At any time during or after a criminal proceeding, the court reporter shall release for safekeeping any firearm or contraband received as an exhibit in that proceeding to:

(1) the sheriff; or

(2) in a county with a population of 500,000 or more, the law enforcement agency that collected, seized, or took possession of the firearm or contraband or produced the firearm or contraband at the proceeding.

(c) The sheriff or the law enforcement agency, as applicable, shall receive and hold the exhibits consisting of firearms or contraband and release them only to the person or persons authorized by the court in which such exhibits have been received or dispose of them as provided by Chapter 18.

(d) In this article, "eligible exhibit" means an exhibit filed with the clerk that:

(1) is not a firearm or contraband;

(2) has not been ordered by the court to be returned to its owner; and

(3) is not an exhibit in another pending criminal action.

(e) An eligible exhibit may be disposed of as provided by this article:

(1) on or after the first anniversary of the date on which a conviction becomes final in the case, if the case is a misdemeanor or a felony for which the sentence imposed by the court is five years or less;

(2) on or after the second anniversary of the date on which a conviction becomes final in the case, if the case is a non-capital felony for which the sentence imposed by the court is greater than five years;

(3) on or after the first anniversary of the date of the acquittal of a defendant; or

(4) on or after the first anniversary of the date of the death of a defendant.

(f) Subject to Subsections (g), (h), (i), and (j), a clerk may dispose of an eligible exhibit or may deliver the eligible exhibit to the county purchasing agent for disposal as surplus or salvage property under Section 263.152, Local Government Code, if on the date provided by Subsection (e) the clerk has not received a request for the exhibit from either the attorney representing the state in the case or the attorney representing the defendant.

(f-1) Notwithstanding Section 263.156, Local Government Code, or any other law, the commissioners court shall remit 50 percent of any proceeds of the disposal of an eligible exhibit as surplus or salvage property as described by Subsection (f), less the reasonable expense of keeping the exhibit before disposal and the costs of that disposal, to each of the following:

(1) the county treasury, to be used only to defray the costs incurred by the district clerk of the county for the management, maintenance, or destruction of eligible exhibits in the county; and

(2) the state treasury to the credit of the compensation to victims of crime fund established under Subchapter J, Chapter 56B.

(g) A clerk in a county with a population of less than 2.5 million must provide written notice by mail to the attorney representing the state in the case and the attorney representing the defendant before disposing of an eligible exhibit.

(h) The notice under Subsection (g) of this article must:

(1) describe the eligible exhibit;

(2) give the name and address of the court holding the exhibit; and

(3) state that the eligible exhibit will be disposed of unless a written request is received by the clerk before the 31st day after the date of notice.

(i) If a request is not received by a clerk covered by Subsection (g) before the 31st day after the date of notice, the clerk may dispose of the eligible exhibit in the manner permitted by this article, including the delivery of the eligible exhibit for disposal as surplus or salvage property as described by Subsection (f).

(j) If a request is timely received, the clerk shall deliver the eligible exhibit to the person making the request if the court determines the requestor is the owner of the eligible exhibit.

(k) In this article, "digital multimedia evidence" means evidence stored or transmitted in a binary form and includes data representing documents, audio, video metadata, and any other information attached to a digital file.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 212, ch. 119, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 27, 1979; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 967, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Subsecs. (a), (b) amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 580, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1026 (H.B. 1048), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 795 (S.B. 1259), Sec. 10, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 829 (S.B. 1774), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 911 (S.B. 1228), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 1728), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 469 (H.B. 4173), Sec. 2.06, eff. January 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2023.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.211. HATE CRIME REPORTING. In addition to performing duties required by Article 2.21, a clerk of a district or county court in which an affirmative finding under Article 42.014 is requested shall report that request to the Texas Judicial Council, along with a statement as to whether the request was granted by the court and, if so, whether the affirmative finding was entered in the judgment in the case. The clerk shall make the report required by this article not later than the 30th day after the date the judgment is entered in the case.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 85, Sec. 4.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.212. WRIT OF ATTACHMENT REPORTING. Not later than the 30th day after the date a writ of attachment is issued in a district court, statutory county court, or county court, the clerk of the court shall report to the Texas Judicial Council:

(1) the date the attachment was issued;

(2) whether the attachment was issued in connection with a grand jury investigation, criminal trial, or other criminal proceeding;

(3) the names of the person requesting and the judge issuing the attachment; and

(4) the statutory authority under which the attachment was issued.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 292 (S.B. 291), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.22. POWER OF DEPUTY CLERKS. Whenever a duty is imposed upon the clerk of the district or county court, the same may be lawfully performed by his deputy.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.23. REPORT TO ATTORNEY GENERAL. (a) The clerks of the district and county courts shall, when requested in writing by the Attorney General, report to the Attorney General not later than the 10th day after the date the request is received, and in the form prescribed by the Attorney General, information in court records that relates to a criminal matter, including information requested by the Attorney General for purposes of federal habeas review.

(b) A state agency or the office of an attorney representing the state shall, when requested in writing by the Attorney General, provide to the Attorney General any record that is needed for purposes of federal habeas review. The agency or office must provide the record not later than the 10th day after the date the request is received and in the form prescribed by the Attorney General.

(c) A district court, county court, state agency, or office of an attorney representing the state may not restrict or delay the reproduction or delivery of a record requested by the Attorney General under this article.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 933 (H.B. 646), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Art. 2.24. AUTHENTICATING OFFICER. (a) The governor may appoint an authenticating officer, in accordance with Subsection (b) of this article, and delegate to that officer the power to sign for the governor or to use the governor's facsimile signature for signing any document that does not have legal effect under this code unless it is signed by the governor.

(b) To appoint an authenticating officer under this article, the governor shall file with the secretary of state a document that contains:

(1) the name of the person to be appointed as authenticating officer and a copy of the person's signature;

(2) the types of documents the authenticating officer is authorized to sign for the governor; and

(3) the types of documents on which the authenticating officer is authorized to use the governor's facsimile signature.

(c) The governor may revoke an appointment made under this article by filing with the secretary of state a document that expressly revokes the appointment of the authenticating agent.

(d) If an authenticating officer signs a document described in Subsection (a) of this article, the officer shall sign in the following manner: "__________, Authenticating Officer for Governor __________."

(e) If a provision of this code requires the governor's signature on a document before that document has legal effect, the authorized signature of the authenticating officer or an authorized facsimile signature of the governor gives the document the same legal effect as if it had been signed manually by the governor.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 4289, ch. 684, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1983.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.25. REPORTING CERTAIN ALIENS TO FEDERAL GOVERNMENT. A judge shall report to the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service a person who has been convicted in the judge's court of a crime or has been placed on deferred adjudication for a felony and is an illegal criminal alien as defined by Section 493.015(a), Government Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 85, Sec. 2, eff. May 16, 1995.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.251. DUTIES RELATED TO IMMIGRATION DETAINER REQUESTS. (a) A law enforcement agency that has custody of a person subject to an immigration detainer request issued by United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement shall:

(1) comply with, honor, and fulfill any request made in the detainer request provided by the federal government; and

(2) inform the person that the person is being held pursuant to an immigration detainer request issued by United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement.

(b) A law enforcement agency is not required to perform a duty imposed by Subsection (a) with respect to a person who has provided proof that the person is a citizen of the United States or that the person has lawful immigration status in the United States, such as a Texas driver's license or similar government-issued identification.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 4), Sec. 2.01, eff. September 1, 2017.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Art. 2.26. DIGITAL SIGNATURE AND ELECTRONIC DOCUMENTS. (a) In this section, "digital signature" means an electronic identifier intended by the person using it to have the same force and effect as the use of a manual signature.

(b) An electronically transmitted document issued or received by a court or a clerk of the court in a criminal matter is considered signed if a digital signature is transmitted with the document.

(b-1) An electronically transmitted document is a written document for all purposes and exempt from any additional writing requirement under this code or any other law of this state.

(c) This section does not preclude any symbol from being valid as a signature under other applicable law, including Section 1.201(b)(37), Business & Commerce Code.

(d) The use of a digital signature under this section is subject to criminal laws pertaining to fraud and computer crimes, including Chapters 32 and 33, Penal Code.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 701, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 312 (S.B. 611), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 312 (S.B. 611), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 4.001, eff. September 1, 2021.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.27. INVESTIGATION OF CERTAIN REPORTS ALLEGING ABUSE. (a) On receipt of a report that is assigned the highest priority in accordance with rules adopted by the Department of Family and Protective Services under Section 261.301(d), Family Code, and that alleges an immediate risk of physical or sexual abuse of a child that could result in the death of or serious harm to the child by a person responsible for the care, custody, or welfare of the child, a peace officer from the appropriate local law enforcement agency shall investigate the report jointly with the department or with the agency responsible for conducting an investigation under Subchapter E, Chapter 261, Family Code. As soon as possible after being notified by the department of the report, but not later than 24 hours after being notified, the peace officer shall accompany the department investigator in initially responding to the report.

(b) On receipt of a report of abuse or neglect or other complaint of a resident of a nursing home, convalescent home, or other related institution under Section 242.126(c)(1), Health and Safety Code, the appropriate local law enforcement agency shall investigate the report as required by Section 242.135, Health and Safety Code.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 6.001, eff. September 1, 2011.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.271. INVESTIGATION OF CERTAIN REPORTS ALLEGING ABUSE, NEGLECT, OR EXPLOITATION. Notwithstanding Article 2.27, on receipt of a report of abuse, neglect, exploitation, or other complaint of a resident of a nursing home, convalescent home, or other related institution or an assisted living facility, under Section 260A.007(c)(1), Health and Safety Code, the appropriate local law enforcement agency shall investigate the report as required by Section 260A.017, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 7 (S.B. 7), Sec. 1.05(d), eff. September 28, 2011.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.272. LAW ENFORCEMENT RESPONSE TO CHILD SAFETY CHECK ALERT. (a) If a peace officer locates a child or other person listed on the Texas Crime Information Center's child safety check alert list established under Section 261.3022, Family Code, the officer shall:

(1) immediately contact the Department of Family and Protective Services on the department's dedicated law-enforcement telephone number for statewide intake;

(2) request information from the department regarding the circumstances of the case involving the child or other person; and

(3) request information from the child and the other person regarding the child's safety, well-being, and current residence.

(b) The peace officer may temporarily detain the child or other person to ensure the safety and well-being of the child.

(c) If the peace officer determines that the circumstances described by Section 262.104, Family Code, exist, the officer may take temporary possession of the child without a court order as provided by Section 262.104, Family Code. If the peace officer does not take temporary possession of the child, the officer shall obtain the child's current address and any other relevant information and report that information to the Department of Family and Protective Services.

(d) A peace officer who locates a child or other person listed on the Texas Crime Information Center's child safety check alert list and who reports the child's or other person's current address and other relevant information to the Department of Family and Protective Services shall report to the Texas Crime Information Center that the child or other person has been located and to whom the child was released, as applicable.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1056 (H.B. 2053), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2015.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.273. RELEASE OF CHILD BY LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER. (a) A law enforcement officer who takes possession of a child under Section 262.104, Family Code, may release the child to:

(1) a residential child-care facility licensed by the Department of Family and Protective Services under Chapter 42, Human Resources Code, if the facility is authorized by the department to take possession of the child;

(2) a juvenile probation department;

(3) the Department of Family and Protective Services; or

(4) any other person authorized by law to take possession of the child.

(b) Before a law enforcement officer may release a child to a person authorized by law to take possession of the child other than a governmental entity, the officer shall:

(1) verify with the National Crime Information Center that the child is not a missing child;

(2) search the relevant databases of the National Crime Information Center system, including those pertaining to protection orders, historical protection orders, warrants, sex offender registries, and persons on supervised release to:

(A) verify that the person to whom the child is being released:

(i) does not have a protective order issued against the person; and

(ii) is not registered as a sex offender unless the person is the child's parent or guardian and there are no restrictions regarding the person's contact with the child; and

(B) obtain any other information the Department of Family and Protective Services considers:

(i) relevant to protect the welfare of the child; or

(ii) reflective of the responsibility of the person to whom the child is being released;

(3) call the Department of Family and Protective Services Texas Abuse Hotline to determine whether the person to whom the child is being released is listed in the registry as a person who abused or neglected a child;

(4) verify that the person to whom the child is being released is at least 18 years of age; and

(5) maintain a record regarding the child's placement, including:

(A) identifying information about the child, including the child's name or pseudonyms; and

(B) the name and address of the person to whom the child is being released.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 926 (S.B. 1571), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.28. DUTIES REGARDING MISUSED IDENTITY. On receipt of information to the effect that a person's identifying information was falsely given by a person arrested as the arrested person's identifying information, the local law enforcement agency responsible for collecting identifying information on arrested persons in the county in which the arrest was made shall:

(1) notify the person that:

(A) the person's identifying information was misused by another person arrested in the county;

(B) the person may file a declaration with the Department of Public Safety under Section 411.0421, Government Code; and

(C) the person is entitled to expunction of information contained in criminal records and files under Chapter 55 of this code; and

(2) notify the Department of Public Safety regarding:

(A) the misuse of the identifying information;

(B) the actual identity of the person arrested, if known by the agency; and

(C) whether the agency was able to notify the person whose identifying information was misused.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 339, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.29. REPORT REQUIRED IN CONNECTION WITH FRAUDULENT USE OR POSSESSION OF IDENTIFYING INFORMATION. (a) A peace officer to whom an alleged violation of Section 32.51, Penal Code, is reported shall make a written report to the law enforcement agency that employs the peace officer that includes the following information:

(1) the name of the victim;

(2) the name of the suspect, if known;

(3) the type of identifying information obtained, possessed, transferred, or used in violation of Section 32.51, Penal Code; and

(4) the results of any investigation.

(b) On the victim's request, the law enforcement agency shall provide the report created under Subsection (a) to the victim. In providing the report, the law enforcement agency shall redact any otherwise confidential information that is included in the report, other than the information described by Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 294 (S.B. 122), Sec. 1(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.295. REPORT REQUIRED IN CONNECTION WITH UNAUTHORIZED ACQUISITION OR TRANSFER OF CERTAIN FINANCIAL INFORMATION. (a) A peace officer to whom an alleged violation of Section 31.17, Penal Code, is reported shall make a written report to the law enforcement agency that employs the peace officer that includes the following information:

(1) the name of the victim;

(2) the name of the suspect, if known;

(3) the type of financial sight order or payment card information obtained or transferred in violation of Section 31.17, Penal Code; and

(4) the results of any investigation.

(b) On the victim's request, the law enforcement agency shall provide the report created under Subsection (a) to the victim. In providing the report, the law enforcement agency shall redact any otherwise confidential information that is included in the report, other than the information described by Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 260 (H.B. 1215), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.30. REPORT CONCERNING CERTAIN ASSAULTIVE OR TERRORISTIC OFFENSES. (a) This article applies only to the following offenses:

(1) assault under Section 22.01, Penal Code;

(2) aggravated assault under Section 22.02, Penal Code;

(3) sexual assault under Section 22.011, Penal Code;

(4) aggravated sexual assault under Section 22.021, Penal Code; and

(5) terroristic threat under Section 22.07, Penal Code.

(b) A peace officer who investigates the alleged commission of an offense listed under Subsection (a) shall prepare a written report that includes the information required under Article 5.05(a).

(c) On request of a victim of an offense listed under Subsection (a), the local law enforcement agency responsible for investigating the commission of the offense shall provide the victim, at no cost to the victim, with any information that is:

(1) contained in the written report prepared under Subsection (b);

(2) described by Article 5.05(a)(1) or (2); and

(3) not exempt from disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code, or other law.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1057 (H.B. 2210), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Without reference to the amendment of this article, this article was repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Art. 2.305. REPORT REQUIRED CONCERNING HUMAN TRAFFICKING CASES. (a) This article applies only to:

(1) a municipal police department, sheriff's department, or constable's office in a county with a population of more than 50,000; and

(2) the Department of Public Safety.

(b) An entity described by Subsection (a) that investigates the alleged commission of an offense under Chapter 20A, Penal Code, or the alleged commission of an offense under Chapter 43, Penal Code, which may involve human trafficking, shall submit to the attorney general in the manner and form prescribed by the attorney general a report containing the following information:

(1) the offense being investigated, including the offense code designated by the Department of Public Safety under Article 66.052;

(2) regarding each person suspected of committing the offense:

(A) the person's:

(i) full name;

(ii) gender;

(iii) race or ethnicity, as defined by Article 2.132;

(iv) country of origin, if the person is not a United States citizen or legal permanent resident;

(v) date of birth; and

(vi) age at the time of the offense, if available; and

(B) the case number associated with the person and the offense;

(3) the date and location of the alleged offense, including the city and county;

(4) the disposition of the investigation, if any, regardless of the manner of disposition; and

(5) regarding the victim of the offense:

(A) the victim's:

(i) age;

(ii) gender;

(iii) race or ethnicity, as defined by Article 2.132; and

(iv) country of origin, if the victim is not a United States citizen or legal permanent resident; and

(B) if available, information regarding any victims' service organization or program to which the victim was referred as part of the investigation.

(c) An entity described by Subsection (a) that does not have any investigations or offenses required to be reported under this article during a period specified by the attorney general shall submit to the attorney general a notice stating there are no cases to report, in the manner and form prescribed by the attorney general.

(d) The attorney general may enter into a contract with a university or organization to assist with the collection and analysis of information received under this article. The attorney general shall ensure that all sensitive information is properly protected.

(e) Information described by Subsections (b)(2)(A)(i) and (v) and (b)(2)(B) is not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code.

(f) In consultation with the entities described by Subsection (a), the attorney general shall adopt rules to administer this article, including rules prescribing:

(1) the form and manner of submission of a report or notice required by Subsection (b) or (c); and

(2) additional information to include in a report or notice required by Subsection (b) or (c).

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1303 (H.B. 3800), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 856 (S.B. 800), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 93 (S.B. 1527), Sec. 4.01, eff. September 1, 2023.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article as added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 176 (S.B. 604), Sec. 1

For text of article as added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1341 (S.B. 1233), Sec. 2, see other Art. 2.31.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.31. COUNTY JAILERS. If a jailer licensed under Chapter 1701, Occupations Code, has successfully completed a training program provided by the sheriff, the jailer may execute lawful process issued to the jailer by any magistrate or court on a person confined in the jail at which the jailer is employed to the same extent that a peace officer is authorized to execute process under Article 2.13(b)(2), including:

(1) a warrant under Chapter 15, 17, or 18;

(2) a capias under Chapter 17 or 23;

(3) a subpoena under Chapter 20A or 24; or

(4) an attachment under Chapter 20A or 24.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 176 (S.B. 604), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 469 (H.B. 4173), Sec. 2.07, eff. January 1, 2021.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(3), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article as added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1341 (S.B. 1233), Sec. 2

For text of article as added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 176 (S.B. 604), Sec. 1, see other Art. 2.31.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.31. COUNTY JAILERS. A jailer licensed under Chapter 1701, Occupations Code, may execute lawful process issued to the jailer by any magistrate or court on a person confined in the jail at which the jailer is employed to the same extent that a peace officer is authorized to execute process under Article 2.13(b)(2), including:

(1) a warrant under Chapter 15, 17, or 18;

(2) a capias under Chapter 17 or 23;

(3) a subpoena under Chapter 20A or 24; or

(4) an attachment under Chapter 20A or 24.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1341 (S.B. 1233), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 469 (H.B. 4173), Sec. 2.08, eff. January 1, 2021.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(3), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.32. ELECTRONIC RECORDING OF CUSTODIAL INTERROGATIONS. (a) In this article:

(1) "Electronic recording" means an audiovisual electronic recording, or an audio recording if an audiovisual electronic recording is unavailable, that is authentic, accurate, and unaltered.

(2) "Law enforcement agency" means an agency of the state, or of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state, that employs peace officers who, in the routine performance of the officers' duties, conduct custodial interrogations of persons suspected of committing criminal offenses.

(3) "Place of detention" means a police station or other building that is a place of operation for a law enforcement agency, including a municipal police department or county sheriff's department, and is owned or operated by the law enforcement agency for the purpose of detaining persons in connection with the suspected violation of a penal law. The term does not include a courthouse.

(b) Unless good cause exists that makes electronic recording infeasible, a law enforcement agency shall make a complete and contemporaneous electronic recording of any custodial interrogation that occurs in a place of detention and is of a person suspected of committing or charged with the commission of an offense under:

(1) Section 19.02, Penal Code (murder);

(2) Section 19.03, Penal Code (capital murder);

(3) Section 20.03, Penal Code (kidnapping);

(4) Section 20.04, Penal Code (aggravated kidnapping);

(5) Section 20A.02, Penal Code (trafficking of persons);

(6) Section 20A.03, Penal Code (continuous trafficking of persons);

(7) Section 21.02, Penal Code (continuous sexual abuse of young child or disabled individual);

(8) Section 21.11, Penal Code (indecency with a child);

(9) Section 21.12, Penal Code (improper relationship between educator and student);

(10) Section 22.011, Penal Code (sexual assault);

(11) Section 22.021, Penal Code (aggravated sexual assault); or

(12) Section 43.25, Penal Code (sexual performance by a child).

(c) For purposes of Subsection (b), an electronic recording of a custodial interrogation is complete only if the recording:

(1) begins at or before the time the person being interrogated enters the area of the place of detention in which the custodial interrogation will take place or receives a warning described by Section 2(a), Article 38.22, whichever is earlier; and

(2) continues until the time the interrogation ceases.

(d) For purposes of Subsection (b), good cause that makes electronic recording infeasible includes the following:

(1) the person being interrogated refused to respond or cooperate in a custodial interrogation at which an electronic recording was being made, provided that:

(A) a contemporaneous recording of the refusal was made; or

(B) the peace officer or agent of the law enforcement agency conducting the interrogation attempted, in good faith, to record the person's refusal but the person was unwilling to have the refusal recorded, and the peace officer or agent contemporaneously, in writing, documented the refusal;

(2) the statement was not made as the result of a custodial interrogation, including a statement that was made spontaneously by the accused and not in response to a question by a peace officer;

(3) the peace officer or agent of the law enforcement agency conducting the interrogation attempted, in good faith, to record the interrogation but the recording equipment did not function, the officer or agent inadvertently operated the equipment incorrectly, or the equipment malfunctioned or stopped operating without the knowledge of the officer or agent;

(4) exigent public safety concerns prevented or rendered infeasible the making of an electronic recording of the statement; or

(5) the peace officer or agent of the law enforcement agency conducting the interrogation reasonably believed at the time the interrogation commenced that the person being interrogated was not taken into custody for or being interrogated concerning the commission of an offense listed in Subsection (b).

(e) A recording of a custodial interrogation that complies with this article is exempt from public disclosure as provided by Section 552.108, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 686 (H.B. 34), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1122 (S.B. 1253), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 221 (H.B. 375), Sec. 2.06, eff. September 1, 2021.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(1), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article as added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1011 (H.B. 1758), Sec. 1

For text of article as added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 534 (S.B. 69), Sec. 1, see other Art. 2.33.

For text of article as added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 979 (S.B. 2212), Sec. 1, see other Art. 2.33.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.33. LAW ENFORCEMENT POLICY ON USE OF FORCE BY DRONE. (a) In this article:

(1) "Drone" means an unmanned aircraft, watercraft, or ground vehicle or a robotic device that:

(A) is controlled remotely by a human operator; or

(B) operates autonomously through computer software or other programming.

(2) "Law enforcement agency" means an agency of the state or an agency of a political subdivision of the state authorized by law to employ peace officers.

(b) Each law enforcement agency that uses or intends to use a drone for law enforcement purposes shall:

(1) adopt a written policy regarding the agency's use of force by means of a drone, before the agency first uses a drone, and update the policy as necessary; and

(2) not later than January 1 of each even-numbered year, submit the policy to the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement in the manner prescribed by the commission.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1011 (H.B. 1758), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(4), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.34. USE OF NECK RESTRAINTS DURING SEARCH OR ARREST PROHIBITED. A peace officer may not intentionally use a choke hold, carotid artery hold, or similar neck restraint in searching or arresting a person unless the restraint is necessary to prevent serious bodily injury to or the death of the officer or another person.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 534 (S.B. 69), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(4), eff. January 1, 2025.

Redesignated by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(6), eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 2.35. DUTY TO REQUEST AND RENDER AID. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a peace officer who encounters an injured person while discharging the officer's official duties shall immediately and as necessary:

(1) request emergency medical services personnel to provide the person with emergency medical services; and

(2) while waiting for emergency medical services personnel to arrive, provide first aid or treatment to the person to the extent of the officer's skill and training.

(b) The peace officer is not required to request emergency medical services or provide first aid or treatment under Subsection (a) if:

(1) making the request or providing the treatment would expose the officer or another person to a risk of bodily injury; or

(2) the officer is injured and physically unable to make the request or provide the treatment.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 979 (S.B. 2212), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(4), eff. January 1, 2025.

Redesignated by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(7), eff. September 1, 2023.